Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-319
City attorney; duties; compensation; additional legal assistance.

The city attorney shall be the legal advisor of the council and city officers. The city attorney shall commence, prosecute, and defend all suits and actions necessary to be commenced, prosecuted, or defended on behalf of the city, or that may be ordered by the council. He shall attend meetings of the council and give them his opinion upon any matters submitted to him, either orally or in writing as may be required. The mayor and city council shall have the right to pay the city attorney additional compensation for legal services performed by him for the city or to employ additional legal assistance and to pay for such legal assistance out of the funds of the city. Whenever the mayor and city council have by ordinance so authorized, the board of public works shall have the right to pay the city attorney additional compensation for legal services performed by him for it or to employ additional legal assistance other than the city attorney and pay such legal assistance out of funds disbursed under the orders of the board of public works.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 27, p. 237;

R.S.1913, § 4885;

C.S.1922, § 4053;

C.S.1929, § 16-315;

R.S.1943, § 16-319;

Laws 1947, c. 26, § 1, p. 127;

Laws 1955, c. 30, § 1, p. 136.

City attorney is appointive officer and not principal officer; may be removed at any time by mayor with approval of majority of city council; and has no statutory power to make governmental decisions which affect the city. Communication Workers of America, AFL-CIO v. City of Hastings, 198 Neb. 668, 254 N.W.2d 695 (1977).

Where city attorney joined in resisting action to recover funds, demand to bring action was not required. Arthur v. Trindel, 168 Neb. 429, 96 N.W.2d 208 (1959).